Louisiana, session 2026, HB926.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IX of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:1300.81 through 1300.86, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. LOUISIANA MEDICAL FREEDOM ACT
§1300.81. Short title
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Medical
Freedom Act".
§1300.82. Purpose
The purpose of this Act is to protect the right of individuals to make
autonomous decisions regarding medical interventions without discrimination,
coercion, or exclusion by public entities.
§1300.83. Definitions
As used in this Section:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-165 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 926
(1)(a) "Government entity" means any state, parish, municipal, or local
government or any political subdivision thereof, including but not limited to any
department, agency, authority, commission, board, council, committee, office, task
force, working group, or other body established by or under the authority of the laws
of such government or subdivision.
(b) "Government entity" excludes doctor's offices, hospitals, licensed
healthcare providers and facilities, medical centers, and nursing homes.
(2) "Medical intervention" means a medical procedure, treatment, device,
drug, injection, medication, or medical action taken to monitor, diagnose, prevent,
treat, or cure a disease or alter the health or biological function of a person. Medical
interventions include but are not limited to vaccines, biologics, swabs, and tests
including genetic and genomic testing, pills, capsules, creams, sprays, liquids,
injections, chips, devices, and monitors. Medical devices do not include medical
masks.
§1300.84. Prohibition of medical mandates
A. A ticket issuer operating in a public building shall not discriminate
against or deny access to any person at an event based on his status with respect to
any medical intervention.
B. No government entity or official shall require a medical intervention for
any of the following:
(1) Access to government services.
(2) Use of public buildings, facilities, infrastructure, or transportation.
(3) Employment by government entities.
C. Any requirements for medical interventions which are allowed in
accordance with this Part remain subject to any applicable laws or legal precedents
providing for or protecting exemptions and reasonable accommodations.
D. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prevent compliance with child
welfare laws of the state including but not limited to R.S. 17:170 et seq.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-165 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 926
§1300.85. Enforcement and remedies
Violations of this Part may be prosecuted by the state's attorney general or
appropriate parish or municipal prosecutor. If a violation is proven attorney's fees
and court costs may be awarded.
§1300.86. Non-exclusion of healthy individuals
Under no circumstance shall a healthy individual or alleged asymptomatic
carrier of an illness be excluded from public activities based on the individual having
declined a medical intervention during an outbreak or public health emergency. This
non-exclusion shall not apply to educational settings such as childcare or schools.
Section 2. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.